South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3122.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 7, Chapter 17, Title 16 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 16-17-780. (A) No person, except an authorized governmental employee as provided for in Section 48-39-370, shall operate any type of vehicle on the beaches in the State. (B) A person convicted of violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction must be: (1) for a first offense, fined not less than one hundred dollars or imprisoned not more than thirty days, or both. (2) for a second offense, fined not less than two hundred dollars or imprisoned not more than sixty days, or both. (3) for a third or subsequent offense, fined not less than five hundred dollars or imprisoned not more than ninety days, or both. SECTION 2.  Chapter 39, Title 48 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 48-39-370. (A) Except as provided for in subsection (B), authorized governmental employees may operate vehicles on the beaches of the State within their jurisdiction to the extent required to perform employment or contractual duties. (B) From May first to October first each year between the hours of 10:00 am and 4:00 pm, the only vehicles that may be operated by authorized governmental employees on the beaches of the State within their jurisdiction are all-terrain vehicles, utility-terrain vehicles, golf carts, and any vehicle that is similar in size, dimension, and weight to such vehicles. However, the provisions of this subsection do not apply to first responders responding to an active emergency provided the vehicle's emergency sirens and rotating lights are being operated. (C)(1) Any local government that violates the provisions of this subsection may be subject to the forfeiture of funds for beach projects, including renourishing and drainage repairs, and may be ineligible for future funding related to such projects. (2) An authorized governmental employee who violates the provisions of this section may be subject to the criminal penalties provided for in Section 16-17-780. (D) For purposes of this section, "authorized governmental employee" means any authorized governmental employee and any independent contractor that is under contract with and approved by the local governmental jurisdiction. SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025. ----XX----